<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89214-0010 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.2-14-89.f2.A1009</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register </T4>/ Vol. 54, No. 29 / Tuesday, February 14, 1989/ Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="56">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Food and Drug Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">21 CFR Part 338 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 75N-0244] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Nighttime Sleep-Aid Drug Products for Over-the-Counter Human Use;Final Monograph </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Food and Drug Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Food and Drug Administration (FDA) is issuing a finalrule in the form of a final monograph establishing conditions under whichover-the-counter (OTC) nighttime sleep-aid drug products are generallyrecognized as safe and effective and not misbranded. FDA is issuing thisfinal rule after considering public comments on the agency's proposed regulation,which was issued in the form of a tentative final monograph, and all newdata and information on nighttime sleep-aid drug products that have cometo the agency's attention. This final monograph deals only with singleingredient nighttime sleep-aid drug products and is part of the ongoingreview of OTC drug products conducted by FDA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE:</T2> February 14, 1990.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>William E. Gilbertson, Centerfor Drug Evaluation and Research (HFD-210), Food and Drug Administration,5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857, 301-295-8000.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>In the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of December 8, 1975 (40 FR 57292), FDA published,under andSection; 330.10(a)(6) (21 CFR 330.10(a)(6)), an advance notice ofproposed rulemaking to establish a monograph for OTC nighttime sleep-aiddrug products, together with the recommendations of the Advisory Reviewpanel on OTC Sedative, Tranquilizer, and Sleep-aid Drug Products (Sleep-aidPanel), which was the advisory review Panel responsible for evaluatingdata on the active ingredients in this drug class. Interested persons wereinvited to submit comments by March 8, 1976. Reply comments in responseto comments filed in the initial comment period could be submitted by April8, 1976. In accordance with andSection; 330.10(a)(10), the data and information consideredby the Panel were put on public display in the Dockets Management Branch(HFA-305), Food and Drug Administration, Rm. 4-62, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville,MD 20857, after deletion of a small amount of trade secret information.The agency's proposed regulation, in the form of a tentative final monograph,for OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug products was published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of June 13, 1978 (43 FR 25544). Interested personswere invited to file by August 14, 1978 written objections and requestsfor an oral hearing before the Commissioner of Food and Drugs regardingthe proposal. Final agency action occurs with the publication of this finalmonograph, which is a final rule establishing a monograph for OTC nighttimesleep-aid drug products.In the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of October 26, 1979 (44 FR 61610), the agencypublished a notice reopening the administrative record for OTC nighttimesleep-aid drug products from October 26, 1979, to March 26, 1980, to permitmanufacturers to submit, prior to the establishment of a final monograph,new data demonstrating the safety and effectiveness of those conditionsnot classified in Category I. Interested persons were invited to submitcomments on the new data on or before May 27, 1980. Data and informationreceived after the administrative record was reopened are on display inthe Dockets Management Branch.In a notice published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of March 21, 1980 (45 FR 18399), the agency advisedthat it had also reopened the administrative record for OTC nighttime sleep-aiddrug products to allow for consideration of data and information that hadbeen filed in the Dockets Management Branch during the period from August14, 1978, to October 26, 1979. The agency concluded that any new data andinformation filed prior to March 21, 1980 should be available to the agencyin developing a final monograph.In the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of April 23, 1982 (47 FR 17740), the agency publisheda notice announcing an enforcement policy to permit the OTC marketing ofdiphenhydramine as an ingredient in OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug productspending the establishment of a final monograph on OTC nighttime sleep-aiddrug products. In that notice, the Commissioner concluded that there wereno unresolved safety or effectiveness issues relating to the use of diphenhydramineas an OTC nighttime sleep-aid and that it would be inappropriate, and notin the public interest, to continue to bar the interim marketing of suchproducts.The OTC drug procedural regulations (21 CFR 330.10) now provide that anytesting necessary to resolve the safety or effectiveness issues that formerlyresulted in a Category III classification, and submission to FDA of theresults of that testing or any other data, must be done during the OTCdrug rulemaking process before the establishment of a final monograph.Accordingly, FDA is no longer using the terms ``Category I'' (generallyrecognized as safe and effective and not misbranded), ``Category II'' (notgenerally recognized as safe and effective or misbranded), and ``CategoryIII'' (available data are insufficient to classify as safe and effective,and further testing is required) at the final monograph stage, but is usinginstead the terms ``monograph conditions'' (old Category I) and ``nonmonographconditions'' (old Categories II and III).The agency advises that the conditions under which the drug products thatare subject to this monograph will be generally recognized as safe andeffective and not misbranded (monograph conditions) will be effective 12months after the date of publication in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. Therefore, on or after February 14, 1990, noOTC drug product that is subject to the monograph and that contains a nonmonographcondition, i.e., a condition that would cause the drug to be not generallyrecognized as safe and effective or to be misbranded, may be initiallyintroduced or initially delivered for introduction into interstate commerceunless it is the subject of an approved application. Further, any OTC drugproduct subject to this monograph that is repackaged or relabeled afterthe effective date of the monograph must be in compliance with the monographregardless of the date the product was initially introduced or initiallydelivered for introduction into interstate commerce. Manufacturers areencouraged to comply voluntarily with the monograph at the earliest possibledate.In the tentative final monograph for OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug products,the agency suggested that the conditions included in the monograph (CategoryI) be effective 30 days after the date of publication of the final monographin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> and that the conditions excluded from the monograph(Category II) be eliminated from OTC drug products effective 6 months afterthe date of publication of the final monograph, regardless of whether furthertesting was undertaken to justify their future use. Experience has shownthat relabeling of products covered by the monograph is necessary in orderfor manufacturers to comply with the monograph. New labels containing themonograph labeling have to be written, ordered, received, and incorporatedinto the manufacturing process. The agency has determined that it is impracticalto expect new labeling to be in effect 30 days after the date of publicationof the final monograph. Experience has shown also that if the deadlinefor relabeling is too short, the agency is burdened with extension requestsand related paperwork.In addition, some products may have to be reformulated to comply with themonograph. Reformulation often involves the need to do stability testingon the new product. An accelerated aging process may be used to test anew formulation; however, if the stability testing is not successful, andfurther reformulation is required, there could be a further delay in havinga new product available for manufacture.The agency wishes to establish a reasonable period of time for relabelingand reformulation in order to avoid an unnecessary disruption of the marketplace,that could not only result in economic loss but also interfere with consumers'access to safe and effective drug products. Therefore, the agency is providingan effective date of 12 months after the date of publication of the finalmonograph in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.In response to the proposed rule on OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug products,four consumers, two consumer groups, six drug manufacturers, one drug manufacturerassociation, and one consultant representing four different drug manufacturerssubmitted comments. Requests for oral hearing before the Commissioner werealso received on 12 different issues. Copies of the comments and the hearingrequests received are on public display in the Dockets Management Branch.Any additional information that has come to the agency's attention sincepublication of the proposed rule is also on public display in the DocketsManagement Branch.In proceeding with this final monograph, the agency has considered allobjections, requests for oral hearings, and the changes in the proceduralregulations. In light of the changes in the OTC drug review proceduralregulations and the withdrawal of methapyrilene from the marketplace (seebelow), many of the objections filed in response to the agency's proposedregulation on OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug products are no longer applicable,e.g., comments on testing guidelines and on methapyrilene. In those caseswhere the agency has agreed with submitted objections and has revised thefinal monograph accordingly, the Commissioner concludes that any requestsfor hearing are moot. Therefore, such hearing requests are not discussedin the following responses to comments.One comment requested hearings on several aspects of the rule if the Commissioner,in making his decisions, relied upon evidence that was not in the publicdomain. The Commissioner advises that the agency's decisions in this rulemakinghave been based entirely on the administrative record, which is publiclyavailable in the Dockets Management Branch. Therefore, the Commissionerconcludes that the comment is no longer requesting hearings on those issues.All other requests for hearing are discussed below.All ``OTC Volumes'' cited throughout this document refer to the submissionsmade by interested persons pursuant to the call-for-data notice publishedin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of August 9, 1972 (37 FR 16029), or to additionalinformation that has come to the agency's attention since publication ofthe notice of proposed rulemaking. The volumes are on public display inthe Dockets Management Branch.<ITAG tagnum="84">I. The Agency's Conclusions on the Comments</ITAG>A. General Comments on OTC Nighttime Sleep-Aid Drug Products1. One comment requested that the agency not remove nighttime sleep-aiddrug products from the OTC market. The tentative final monograph on nighttime sleep-aid drug products (43FR 25544) did not propose to remove this entire class of drug productsfrom the OTC market. The agency recognized the usefulness of this classof drugs, but concluded that the data available at that time were not sufficientfor FDA to determine that any specific ingredients in this class of drugswere generally recognized as safe and effective. Since that time, additionaldata have been submitted to the OTC drug review to support the safety andeffectiveness of diphenhydramine hydrochloride and diphenhydramine monocitrate(now named diphenhydramine citrate), and these ingredients are includedin the final monograph for OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug products. In addition,products containing doxylamine succinate are marketed OTC as a nighttimesleep-aid under approved new drug applications (NDA's).2. One comment argued that the Commissioner had failed to follow the prescribedprocedures in issuing the tentative final monograph on OTC nighttime sleep-aidsand that it is without legal authority. The comment also contended thatthe tentative final monograph is arbitrary, capricious, and not supportedby substantial evidence and requested a hearing on this issue.At the time of publication of the panel's report and recommended monographin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of December 8, 1975 (40 FR 57292), andSection;330.10(a)(6) provided for a comment period of 60 days after publicationof a panel's report and recommended monograph, and a period of 30 daysfrom the last day of the comment period for reply comments to be filed.In the report, the agency allowed for a comment period of 90 days, whichconforms with current 330.10(a)(6). Section 330.10(a)(7) provided thatafter reviewing all comments and reply comments, a tentative final monographwould be published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The agency received comments and reviewed them.In the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of June 13, 1978 (40 FR 57292), the agency respondedto the comments in the tentative final monograph. Section 330.10(a)(7)has been subsequently expanded to require review of new data prior to publicationof a tentative final monograph. The comment does not specify what procedures it alleges that the Commissionerfailed to follow and the agency is not aware of any. Therefore, the agencyconcludes that it followed the prescribed procedures set forth in 21 CFR330.10(a)(6) and (7) for publishing a tentative final monograph on OTCnighttime sleep-aid drug products. The agency rejects the comment's contentionthat the tentative final monograph is without legal authority. The legalauthority for this rulemaking process is provided by the Federal Food,Drug, and Cosmetic Act (the act), as cited in the ``Authority'' paragraphwhich immediately precedes the monograph. The agency's conclusions reachedin the tentative final monograph are supported and well documented withreferences publicly available in the administrative record for this rulemaking.Therefore, the agency concludes the comment's contention is not valid.The Commissioner also concludes that a hearing on this issue is not warranted.3. One comment objected to the statement in the tentative final monograph``that OTC drugs should contain only such inactive ingredients as are knownto be safe and are necessary for pharmaceutical formulation'' (43 FR 25544at 25590). The comment contended that this statement is without sanctionof law and is inconsistent with other FDA regulations. The comment requestedrevocation of the statement. The statement in question was part of the preamble and not part of thetentative final monograph; thus, it need not be ``revoked'' as the commentrequested. The act and the regulations implementing the OTC drug reviewprovide clear authority for requiring that inactive ingredients be safe.The act requires all drugs to be both safe and effective for their intendeduse. Thus, inactive ingredients that are included in drug products alsoneed to be safe in order for the product to conform to the requirementsof the act. The OTC drug review regulations in andSection; 330.1(e) furtherstate that OTC drug products should contain ``only suitable inactive ingredientswhich are safe in the amounts administered and do not interfere with theeffectiveness of the preparation * * *.'' The food ingredient GRAS (generallyrecognized as safe) list in 21 CFR Part 182 includes most of the commoninactive ingredients, including flavors. Color additives are already regulatedunder section 706 of the act (21 U.S.C. 376) and the implementing regulationsin 21 CFR Parts 70 through 82. An ingredient, whether active or inactive,should be included in a drug product only if it provides a benefit andis therefore ``necessary.'' Typically, inactive ingredients are necessaryfor a drug product's pharmaceutical formulation during the manufacturingprocess and for making the product acceptable to the user in terms of taste,appearance, and aroma. Such ingredients may be used provided they do notinterfere with the product's effectiveness. 4. One comment urged the agency to require long-term carcinogenicity studieson all the ingredients placed in Category III as nighttime sleep-aids beforethey are given general recognition of safety. FDA is aware that all of the antihistamine ingredients placed in CategoryIII in the tentative final monograph on OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug products(43 FR 25544 at 25579), except for phenyltoloxamine dihydrogen citrate,have been selected for bioassay testing as part of the National ToxicologyProgram_Carcinogenicity Testing Program (Ref. 1). The selection of a chemicalfor bioassay does not necessarily imply that it is a carcinogen. Chemicalsare selected on the basis of human exposure, production levels, and chemicalstructure. Selection of a chemical for carcinogenicity testing is not asufficient basis for withholding conclusions on its effectiveness and onother aspects of safety in an OTC drug final monograph. The inclusion ofan ingredient in a final monograph means that the agency has concludedthat it is generally recognized as safe and effective based on the evidenceavailable at that time; it does not preclude the possibility that futureevidence may demonstrate an ingredient to be unsafe for OTC use. If futureevidence, e.g., results of bioassay testing, demonstrates that an ingredientis unsafe for OTC use, the agency will take immediate steps to remove productscontaining this ingredient from the marketplace. The Panel had placed the antihistamine methapyrilene in Category III inits report (40 FR 57292 at 57309). In its proposed regulation for OTC nighttimesleep-aid drug products, the agency proposed to place methapyrilene inCategory II because of preliminary studies implicating this drug as a carcinogen,or a carcinogen synergist with nitrates, in rats. However, at that time,the studies were too preliminary to support a definitive finding that methapyrilenewas itself a carcinogen and had to be removed immediately from all productsin the OTC drug market.Subsequent to the agency's proposed regulation, a National Cancer Institute(NCI) study, not available to the Panel, provided data from which the agencyconcluded that methapyrilene is a potent carcinogen in animals and mustbe considered a potential human carcinogen. These data are on file in theDockets Management Branch (address above) under Docket No. 75N-0244 andhave since been published (Ref. 2). In 1979, in response to an agency-requested recall, all oral and topicalproducts containing methapyrilene were removed from the market. Productscontaining methapyrilene are now considered to be misbranded under section502 of the act (21 U.S.C. 352) and ``new drugs'' under section 201(p) ofthe act (21 U.S.C. 321(p)). In this document the agency concludes thatmethapyrilene fumarate and methapyrilene hydrochloride are nonmonographingredients. <ITAG tagnum="81">References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Copy of a computer printout from the National Toxicology Program_Carcinogenicity Testing Program, OTC Volume 050FM, Docket No. 75N-0244,Dockets Management Branch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Lijinsky, W., M.D. Reuber, and B.N. Blackwell, ``Liver TumorsInduced in Rats by Chronic Oral Administration of the Common AntihistamineMethapyrilene Hydrochloride,'' <T3>Science, </T3>209:817-819, 1980.</ITAG>5. One comment requested that FDA require long-term anticholinergic toxicitystudies on the Category III nighttime sleep-aid ingredients that are nowrestricted to prescription use before allowing them on the OTC market.In addition, the comment requested that pyrilamine be removed from theOTC market until such studies are done. The comment was concerned thateven though anticholinergic (drying) side effects have been considerednegligible in the past, they may be rooted in irreversible tissue damageand neuropharmacologic damage. Diphenhydramine is the only ingredient currently included in this monograph,and the anticholinergic effects of this drug are well known (Ref. 1). Becausediphenhydramine has been safely used for many years and FDA is not awareof any data that indicate that long-term use of this drug can cause irreversibletissue damage and neuropharmacologic damage, the agency finds no need forlong-term anticholinergic toxicity studies as requested by the comment.The agency will assess the need for such studies for other ingredientsshould any other prescription drugs be considered for inclusion in themonograph. Pyrilamine maleate, presently marketed OTC in a few products as a nighttimesleep-aid, is not included in this final monograph because of a lack ofgeneral recognition of effectiveness. (See comment 21 below.) Upon theeffective date of the monograph, OTC drug products containing pyrilaminemaleate intended for use as a nighttime sleep-aid may not be initiallyintroduced or initially delivered for introduction into interstate commerceunless they are the subject of an approved NDA or have been included inthe final monograph by that date. The agency does not believe that thereis a health hazard associated with this drug so as to require its immediateremoval from the market. The agency is aware that a number of OTC nighttimesleep-aid drug products that previously contained pyrilamine maleate havebeen reformulated to contain diphenhydramine and further expects that theremaining drug products containing pyrilamine maleate will be reformulatedwith diphenhydramine in advance of the effective date of this final monograph.<ITAG tagnum="81">Reference </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Copy of FDA-approved labeling from NDA 5-845, OTC Volume 050FM,Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG>6. One comment urged FDA to undertake studies on l-tryptophan, a naturallyoccurring food substance, as a nighttime sleep-aid. The comment statedthat, considering that there is no sleep-aid ingredient that is safe andeffective and because drug companies will not spend money for testing substancesthat cannot be patented, FDA should undertake such studies for the publicgood.The agency appreciates the comment's concerns. However, FDA's primary chargeis to ensure that drugs in the marketplace are both safe and effectivefor their intended use, not to conduct original research in the developmentof new drugs. In addition, this final monograph contains ingredients thatare considered safe and effective for use as OTC nighttime sleep-aids.7. One comment urged the agency to recognize the legal status of the monographsissued under the OTC drug review as being interpretative rather than substantiveregulations.The agency addressed this issue in paragraphs 85 through 91 of the preambleto the procedures for classification of OTC drugs published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of May 11, 1972 (37 FR 9464), and in paragraph3 of the preamble to the tentative final monograph for OTC antacid drugproducts published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of November 12, 1973 (38 FR 31260). FDA reaffirmsthe conclusions stated there. Subsequent court decisions have confirmedthe agency's authority to issue substantive regulations by rulemaking.(See, e.g., <T3>National Nutritional Foods Association</T3> v. <T3>Weinberger,</T3> 512 F.2d 688, 696-98 (2d Cir. 1975) and <T3>National Association of Pharmaceutical Manufacturers</T3> v.<T3> FDA,</T3> 487 F. Supp. 412 (S.D.N.Y. 1980), <T3>aff'd,</T3> 637 F.2d 887 (2d Cir. 1981).)8. One comment disagreed with the agency's statement in the tentative finalmonograph that the Panel had gone beyond its charter in making statementson advertising (43 FR 25544 at 25545). The comment believed that the agency'sstatement was in contradiction to a later statement that the OTC advisoryreview panels ``are free to comment, on any scientific or policy issuethat they have considered in the course of their review'' (43 FR 25558).The comment urged the agency to adopt a formal statement of policy withrespect to advertising and include it in the monograph.The agency disagrees with the comment that the two statements are in contradiction.The OTC advisory review panels were charged to advise the agency on thesafety, effectiveness, and labeling of OTC drug products. They were notcharged with making recommendations on advertising because the FederalTrade Commission (FTC), not FDA, is the agency that has the primary responsibilityfor regulating OTC drug advertising. FDA has the authority to regulateOTC drug advertising that constitutes labeling under the Federal Food,Drug, and Cosmetic Act. See, e.g.,<T3> United States</T3> v.<T3> Article of Drug * * * B-Complex Cholinos Capsules,</T3> 362 F.2d 923(3d Cir. 1966);<T3> V.E. Irons, Inc.</T3> v.<T3> United States, </T3>244 F.2d 34 (10th Cir.); <T3>cert. denied,</T3> 354 U.S. 923 (1957). In addition, for an OTC drugto be generally recognized as safe and effective and not misbranded, theadvertising for the drug must, satisfy the FDA regulations in andSection;330.1(d) (21 CFR 330.1(d)), which state that the advertising may prescribe,recommend, or suggest the drug's use only under the conditions stated inthe labeling. If advertising for an OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug productoffers the product for conditions not included in the final monograph labeling,the drug product may be subject to regulatory action by FDA. Therefore,as stated in the tentative final monograph, advisory review panels arefree to comment on any aspect of OTC drug regulation notwithstanding FDA'slimited authority to implement their recommendations. Because the agency'sjurisdiction over OTC drug advertising is already stated in the act andin existing agency regulations that are applicable to all OTC drug monographs,the comment's request for inclusion of a policy statement on advertisingin this particular monograph is not necessary.9. One comment disagreed with the agency's statements in the tentativefinal monograph that the Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC) andnot FDA has the authority to place limitations on package size (43 FR 25544at 25546). The comment stated that CPSC has authority to require child-resistantclosures, but does not have the authority to regulate the quantity availablein a product container. The comment expressed the belief that, under theact, FDA has authority to limit the conditions under which a drug is usedincluding the quantity of drug in a container. Because of the Panel's concernfor potential harm to children if large quantities of any nighttime sleep-aidare ingested, the comment requested that the agency restrict the quantityof a nighttime sleep-aid packaged per container to a safe level or includea warning that ingestion of large quantities could be lethal. The commentalso requested a hearing on this issue.The agency agrees with the comment that FDA does have authority to placelimitations on package size when deemed necessary, e.g., the recommendedlimitations in the quantity of 1\1/4\ grain (pediatric) aspirin tabletsto 36 tablets per container (21 CFR 201.314(c)). Concerning the comment'srequest that the agency restrict the amount of drug in a nighttime sleep-aidcontainer, however, no evidence has been presented to warrant such a restriction.CPSC has the authority to require child-resistant closures. FDA is awarethat CPSC has reviewed the available data on antihistamines and has determinedthat child-resistant closures are warranted for OTC drug products, includingnighttime sleep-aids, containing more than 66 milligrams (mg) diphenhydraminebase in any oral dosage form. (See 16 CFR 1700.14(a)(17).) The commentdid not submit any data that indicate a need to limit the package sizeof OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug products containing diphenhydramine nordid it submit any data that indicate a need to include a warning that ingestionof large quantities could be lethal. Therefore, FDA does not believe thatlimiting the package size for OTC diphenhydramine-containing nighttimesleep-aids or a warning is necessary at this time. If the agency proposedlimiting the package size of such drug products to 66 mg diphenhydramineor less, each package would contain only one adult dose of 50 mg. Limitingthe package size to a single dose would be impractical. In view of CPSC'sfinal rule on child-resistant packaging, the impracticality of limitinga package size to a single dose, and the comment's failure to submit datasupporting the need for further action, the Commissioner concludes thata hearing by FDA on this issue is not warranted at this time.10. One comment requested FDA to join with FTC in conducting hearings onthe possibilities of deception in labeling and advertising caused by ``look-alike/sound-alike''drugs. The comment noted that the agency's response to this issue was thatif ``look-alike/sound-alike'' drugs presented an opportunity for abuse,appropriate action would be initiated under section 502(a) of the act (seecomment 19, 43 FR 25544 at 25547). The comment maintained ``that enoughevidence is present to warrant affirmative action on this issue.'' The agency recognizes the potential for deception in the marketing of OTC``look-alike/sound-alike'' drugs, including certain OTC nighttime sleep-aidsthat bear a strong physical resemblance to certain controlled prescriptiondrugs, or have trade names that sound like those of controlled drugs. Sincepublication of the tentative final monograph, the agency has become awarethat there is widespread manufacturing, promotion, and marketing of theseOTC ``look-alikes.'' The agency has initiated seizure actions under thecounterfeit drug sections of the act (sections 201(g)(2) and 304(a)(2)),separate from the OTC drug review, in order to remove these products fromthe market. Moreover, there have been several Congressional hearings onthis subject in recent years, and the agency has also discussed this issuein other <T4>Federal Register </T4>documents. (See New Drug Status of OTC CombinationDrug Products Containing Caffeine, Phenylpropanolamine, and Ephedrine,published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of August 13, 1982 (47 FR 35344); EnforcementAction for Certain OTC Drug Products, published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of November 18, 1983 (48 FR 52513); and EnforcementAction Under the New Drug Provisions of the Federal Food, Drug, and CosmeticAct; Certain OTC Drug Products; Advisory Opinion; Amendment, publishedin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of June 29, 1984 (49 FR 26814).) This issue isalso discussed with respect to diphenhydramine in comment 22 below. Basedon previous agency actions and the Congressional hearings that have alreadybeen held, the agency concludes that an additional joint hearing with theFTC to discuss labeling and advertising for such products is not needed.B. Comments on Labeling of OTC Nighttime Sleep-Aid Drug Products 11. Several comments contended that FDA does not have the authority tolegislate the exact wording of OTC labeling claims. The comments contendedthat such a policy is overly restrictive, lacks supporting evidence, andconstitutes a prior restraint on First Amendment rights. The comments concludedthat to ban alternative truthful language is unjustified. Two commentsalso requested a hearing on this issue. In the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of May 1, 1986 (51 FR 16258), the agency publisheda final rule changing its labeling policy for stating the indications foruse of OTC drug products. Under 21 CFR 330.1(c)(2), the label and labelingof OTC drug products are required to contain in a prominent and conspicuouslocation, either (1) the specific wording on indications for use establishedunder an OTC drug monograph, which may appear within a boxed area designated``APPROVED USES''; (2) other wording describing such indications for usethat meets the statutory prohibitions against false or misleading labeling,which shall neither appear within a boxed area nor be designated ``APPROVEDUSES''; or (3) the approved monograph language on indications, which mayappear within a boxed area designated ``APPROVED USES,'' plus alternativelanguage describing indications for use that is not false or misleading,which shall appear elsewhere in the labeling. All other OTC drug labelingrequired by a monograph or other regulation (e.g., statement of identity,warnings, and directions) must appear in the specific wording establishedunder the OTC drug monograph or other regulation where exact language hasbeen established and identified by quotation marks, e.g., 21 CFR 201.63or 330.1(g). The final rule in this document is subject to the labelingprovisions in andSection; 330.1(c)(2). 12. One comment objected to the agency's conclusion in comment 45 of thetentative final monograph (43 FR 25544 at 25553) that the claim ``reducedtime to fall asleep'' is not synonymous with the Category I claim ``helpsfall asleep'' and contended that the only reason for denying the reducedtime claim was that such a phrase would suggest that someone without asleep disturbance could use a sleep-aid. The comment requested a hearingon this issue. In the tentative final monograph, the agency determined that the claim``reduced time to fall asleep'' was not fully synonymous with the requirementsfor Category I nighttime sleep-aid ingredients. The agency stated thatthe use of a nighttime sleep-aid should reduce the time required for aperson to get to sleep by providing the means for such sleep in the caseof an individual who might otherwise remain awake. The agency concludedthat the unqualified claim ``reduced time to fall asleep'' required furtherstudy because it implies that persons without sleep disturbances may benefitfrom the use of OTC nighttime sleep-aids, and no such data had been presented.However, in patients with insomnia (difficulty falling asleep), such aclaim would be reasonable. At the time that the tentative final monographwas proposed (1978), there were no Category I nighttime sleep-aid ingredients.Based on the panel's recommendations (40 FR 57292 at 57328), the agencyproposed as one of the suggested phrases the claim ``helps fall asleep,''but stated that additional studies would be necessary to support such aclaim. Subsequently, studies were submitted to upgrade Category III ingredientsto monograph status. The studies that were found acceptable (see comment22 below) were conducted in persons with sleep difficulties. In those studies,sleep latency (time to fall asleep) was a major parameter studied, andthose ingredients found to be effective as OTC nighttime sleep-aids wereable to reduce the time to fall asleep. Accordingly, the claim ``reducedtime to fall asleep'' has been substantiated, but only in individuals withoccasional sleeplessness or who have difficulty falling asleep. Therefore,the agency is adding the claim (``Helps you'' or ``Reduces time to'') ``fallasleep if you have difficulty falling asleep'' to the indications sectionof the monograph. Based upon these studies, the unqualified claims ``reduces time to fallasleep'' and the previously proposed ``helps fall asleep'' without thedescriptive language relating these claims to the intended target populationare not appropriate as specific indications for OTC nighttime sleep-aiddrug products. However, because the phrases ``helps fall asleep'' and ``reducestime to fall asleep'' are part of the monograph indications for nighttimesleep-aid drug products, the agency would not object to these shortenedphrases appearing elsewhere in the labeling (i.e., outside the boxed area),provided that the complete indication statement(s) appears in the appropriateplace in the labeling. Based upon the discussion above, the agency has revised the definitionof a nighttime sleep-aid that appears in this final monograph to read asfollows: ``A drug that is useful for the relief of occasional sleeplessnessby individuals who have difficulty falling asleep.'' Likewise, the indicationshave been revised to (1) (``Helps you'' or ``Reduces time to'') ``fallasleep if you have difficulty falling asleep,'' (2) ``For relief of occasionalsleeplessness,'' and (3) ``Helps to reduce difficulty falling asleep.''The agency concludes that these changes make it clear that OTC nighttimesleep-aids are intended only for those individuals who have occasionalsleeplessness or who have difficulty falling asleep. Based on these changes,the Commissioner concludes that a hearing on this issue is not warranted.13. One comment objected to the Category II classification of the terms``refreshing sleep'' and ``sound sleep.'' The comment argued that the personwho uses an OTC nighttime sleep-aid wants to avoid occasional sleeplessnessand desires sleep that is refreshing. For this reason, the comment requestedthat the term ``refreshing sleep'' as well as the terms ``restful sleep''and ``good night's sleep'' be moved to Category I. Regarding the term ``soundsleep,'' the comment claimed that a person who experiences ``sound sleep''experiences a sleep with fewer awakenings. The comment argued that forthis reason the ``sound sleep'' claim and the ``fewer awakenings'' claimshould be placed in the same category. The comment noted that the ``fewerawakenings'' claim was placed in Category III in the tentative final monograph,but urged that this claim and the ``sound sleep'' claim both be includedin the monograph. The comment also requested a hearing on this issue. Another comment objected to the agency's Category II placement of the claim``helps you relax so you can fall asleep.'' Arguing that the agency concededthat nighttime sleep-aids provide a relaxant action, the comment referredto the agency's statement at 43 FR 25553 that such a ``product will makeone drowsy, not just relaxed * * *.'' The comment requested that this claimbe moved from Category II to Category I. The above classifications were made in the tentative final monograph beforethe agency received the results of any clinical studies that supportedmonograph status for any OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug. Since that time,the agency has evaluated the results of clinical studies that support thesafety and effectiveness of diphenhydramine hydrochloride and diphenhydraminecitrate for nighttime sleep-aid use. (See comment 22 below.)In those studies, a number of efficacy variables related to the claimsand terms requested by the comments were evaluated. These included thefollowing: (1) How much did the medication help?, (2) wake time, (3) howrested when awoke?, (4) how sleepy during day?, (5) how energetic duringday?, (6) sleep latency, (7) number of awakenings, (8) sleep duration,(9) depth of sleep, and (10) how good was the sleep? As discussed in comment 22 below, in one study, diphenhydramine hydrochloridewas significantly better (p=.05) than placebo for sleep latency, degreeto which medication helped, depth of sleep, and quality (goodness) of sleep.At the less conservative .10 level of significance, diphenhydramine wasbetter than placebo for the amount of time spent awake in bed. In anotherstudy, diphenhydramine was significantly better (p=.05) than placebo forsleep latency, degree to which medication helped, depth of sleep, quality(goodness) of sleep, feeling rested upon awakening, and degree of energyduring previous day. At the less conservative .10 level of significance,diphenhydramine was better than placebo for the amount of time spent awakein bed. All other variables evaluated in the studies were not significant.The claim relating to fewer awakenings, which was placed in Category IIIin the tentative final monograph, reads as follows: ``Reduces the numberof awakenings in persons who wake frequently during the night'' (43 FR25544 at 25588). The agency concluded that this would be a valid claimfor OTC nighttime sleep-aids if supported by evidence in well-controlledstudies. However, none of the studies submitted to support the effectivenessof diphenhydramine as an OTC nighttime sleep-aid supports that claim. Therefore,the scientific data are inadequate to allow inclusion of the ``fewer awakenings''claim in the monograph. Based on the results of the diphenhydramine studies, which showed thatthe nighttime sleep-aid drug improved depth of sleep, quality (goodness)of sleep, feeling rested upon awakening, and degree of energy during previousday, the agency concludes that the data support the terms ``sound sleep,''``restful sleep,'' ``good night's sleep,'' and ``refreshing sleep'' fornighttime sleep-aid drug products. Further, the agency notes that the conceptof rest is included in at least two dictionary definitions for ``relax''(Refs. 1 and 2); therefore, the term ``relaxing'' sleep is also acceptable.However, the agency considers these terms to be descriptive statementsthat do not relate in a significant way to the safe and effective use ofnighttime sleep-aid drug products and, therefore, does not consider suchinformation to be necessary as part of the required indications for theseproducts. Because these terms are examples of truthful and nonmisleadinglanguage, the agency would allow the terms to be included in labeling providedthey are not intermixed with labeling established by the monograph. Basedon the above discussion, the Commissioner concludes that a hearing on thisissue is not warranted. Regarding the statement (made by the agency in the tentative final monographat 43 FR 25544 at 25553) referred to by the comment, the agency was notconceding that OTC nighttime sleep-aids act by relaxing, but rather intendedto emphasize that these drugs act by making one drowsy. Regarding the claim``helps you relax so you can fall asleep,'' the agency considers such aclaim as relating to the mechanism of action of the drug. This efficacyvariable was not evaluated as part of the diphenhydramine studies. Therefore,because the data are inadequate to support such a claim, it is not beingincluded in the monograph. <ITAG tagnum="81">References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) ``Webster's Collegiate Dictionary,'' G. and C. Merriam Co., Springfield,MA, 1976, s.v. ``relaxing.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) ``The American Heritage Dictionary of the English Language,''Houghton Mifflin Co., Boston, 1976, s.v. ``relaxing.''</ITAG>14. One comment objected to the warning in proposed andSection; 338.50(c)(2):``If condition persists continuously for more than 2 weeks, consult yourphysician. Insomnia may be a symptom of serious underlying medical illness.''The comment referred to reasoning provided in its earlier comment to thePanel's report that there is insufficient evidence of abuse of OTC nighttimesleep-aid drug products to warrant such a warning.In addressing this issue in comment 51 of the tentative final monograph(43 FR 25544 at 25554), the agency tentatively concluded that the warningwas necessary because it would help the user to determine when the limitsof self-treatment have been reached. The present comment offers no basisto alter the agency's conclusions; therefore, the warning is included inthe final monograph.15. Several comments objected to the glaucoma warning proposed in andSection;338.50(c)(3)(i). One comment stated that incorporation of this warning,based on a recommendation of the Advisory Review Panel on OTC Cold, Cough,Allergy, Bronchodilator, and Antiasthmatic Drug Products, fails to recognizethe difference between the dosage and pattern of use of antihistaminesin OTC nighttime sleep-aid products and antihistamines in cough/cold products.The comment also cited testimony that a particular sleep-aid drug productcontaining methapyrilene and scopolamine is safe when administered to patientswith glaucoma (Ref. 1).The agency recognizes that antihistamines used as OTC nighttime sleep-aidsare taken only once a day, whereas they may be taken up to six times aday for cough/cold symptoms. However, the nighttime sleep-aid dosage isoften higher than the cough/cold dosage. In addition, there is variationbetween the different antihistamine drugs with respect to the degree ofexpected side effects, and also marked individual variation in responseto antihistamine drugs (Ref. 2). Thus, the agency believes it best to adviseconsumers with glaucoma to seek the advice of a physician before usingantihistamine-containing OTC drug products. The warning, therefore, hasbeen retained in the OTC nighttime sleep-aid final monograph. The comment'scited testimony does not support deleting this warning because neithermethapyrilene nor scopolamine are included in the OTC nighttime sleep-aidfinal monograph.<ITAG tagnum="81">References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"> (1) Comment No. HER003, Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"> (2) Douglas, W.W., ``Histamine and 5-Hydroxytryptamine (Serotonin)and their Antagonists,'' <T3>in</T3> ``The Pharmacological Basis of Therapeutics,'' 7th Ed., editedby A.G. Gilman, et al., MacMillan Publishing Co., New York, p. 621, 1985.</ITAG>16. Several comments objected to the proposed alcohol-antihistamine druginteraction warning in andSection; 338.50(c)(3)(ii), which reads ``Take thisproduct with caution if alcohol is being consumed.'' One comment statedthat the agency did not provide documentation for a potential hazard, andwithout such documentation it is inappropriate to require such a warning.The agency disagrees with the comments. In the tentative final monograph,the agency noted that the Sleep-aid Panel had documentation at 40 FR 57308of an alcohol-antihistamine interaction in which deepened and prolongedsleep was reported. (See 43 FR 25544 at 25554.) The agency concluded thatthe depressant effects of antihistamines and alcohol are additive and couldcreate a greater soporific effect than is desirable (43 FR 25566). In additionto the reference cited by the Panel at 40 FR 57308, the agency points outthat the additive central nervous system depression occurring from simultaneousingestion of antihistamines and alcohol is well-documented in the literature(Refs. 1 through 5).In the tentative final monograph for OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug products,the agency also noted that the Advisory Review Panel on OTC Cold, Cough,Allergy, Bronchodilator, and Antiasthmatic Drug Products had recommendedan antihistamine-alcohol drug interaction warning (43 FR 25544 at 25554).In an amendment to the tentative final monograph for OTC antihistaminedrug products, published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of August 24, 1987 (52 FR 31892), the agencynoted that, in addition to alcohol, sedative and tranquilizer drugs areknown to have additive effects to the drowsiness effect of antihistaminedrug products (52 FR 31911). The agency stated that it felt that consumersshould be warned about these additive effects and proposed a revision tothe warnings for OTC antihistamine drug products, which read as follows:``May cause marked drowsiness; alcohol, sedatives, and tranquilizers mayincrease the drowsiness effect. Avoid alcoholic beverages while takingthis product. Do not take this product if you are taking sedatives or tranquilizers,without first consulting your doctor. Use caution when driving a motorvehicle or operating machinery.'' The agency has reviewed the commentsreceived in response to the publication of that proposed warning. No commentsin opposition to that revised warning were received.Besides alcohol, the Sleep-aid Panel also stated that the depressant actionsof antihistamines are additive with the effects of other central nervoussystem depressants and the concomitant use of * * * drugs known to depressthe central nervous system should be avoided because such combinationsproduce deepened and prolonged sleep (40 FR 57292 at 57308) and excessivesedation and confusion (40 FR 57297).The agency concludes that this important information should appear in thelabeling of OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug products to provide for the safeconsumer use of these products. However, because of the intended use ofa nighttime sleep-aid drug product, the information should be differentfrom that appearing on antihistamine drug products for daytime cold oranti-allergy use. For those products, the drowsiness or marked drowsinesscaused by the antihistamine is a side effect that consumers need to bealerted to, and consumers should be informed to use caution when drivinga motor vehicle or operating machinery. Because the ``Directions'' fora nighttime sleep-aid drug product are for use at bedtime, or as directedby a doctor, it is not necessary to include a warning against use whiledriving a motor vehicle or operating machinery. However, the potentialof excessive sedation or confusion (as noted above) exists if the sleep-aidproduct is taken concomitantly with alcohol, sedatives, or tranquilizers.Therefore, the agency is including the following warning in this finalmonograph: ``Avoid alcoholic beverages while taking this product. Do nottake this product if you are taking sedatives or tranquilizers, withoutfirst consulting your doctor.''<ITAG tagnum="81">References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Noble, E.P., ``Third Special Report to the U.S. Congress on Alcoholand Health,'' Department of Health, Education, and Welfare, National Instituteon Alcohol Abuse and Alcoholism, Rockville, MD, p. 50, June 1978.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) ``British Pharmaceutical Codex 1963,'' Council of the PharmaceuticalSociety of Great Britain, The Pharmaceutical Press, London, p. 20, 1963.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) McIver, A.K., ``Drug Incompatibilities,'' <T3>The Pharmaceutical Journal,</T3> 195:609-612, 1965.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) ``Interactions of Alcohol with Drugs,'' <T3>The Medical Letter,</T3> 19:48, 1977.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Coleman, J.H., and W.E. Evans, ``Drug Interactions with Alcohol,''<T3>Alcohol Health and Research World,</T3> Department of Health, Education,and Welfare, National Institute on Alcohol Abuse and Alcoholism, Rockville,MD, pp. 16-19, 1975.</ITAG>17. Several comments urged the agency to reconsider the need for inclusionof a warning on the label of OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug products regardingthe use of these drugs by pregnant or nursing women. The comments contendedthat even though there are no data to suggest a potential hazard, therehave been no studies to show that these drugs are safe when taken by pregnantor nursing women and that a warning regarding the use of these drugs bypregnant and nursing women should be included in the monograph. In the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of December 3, 1982 (47 FR 54750), the agencypublished a final rule requiring that the labeling for all OTC drugs thatare intended for systemic absorption, unless specifically exempted, containa general warning concerning the use of these drugs by pregnant or nursingwomen. This warning states: ``As with any drug, if you are pregnant ornursing a baby, seek the advice of a health professional before using thisproduct.'' The regulation provides that if a specific warning relatingto use during pregnancy or while nursing has been established for a particulardrug product in an NDA or for a product covered by an OTC drug final monographin Part 330, the specific warning shall be used in place of the generalpregnancy-nursing warning unless otherwise stated in the NDA or in thefinal OTC drug monograph. The agency is not aware of any data at this timethat would necessitate a special warning for the active ingredients includedin the OTC nighttime sleep-aid final monograph. Therefore, these drug productswill be required to bear the general pregnancy-nursing warning in andSection;201.63, as stated above. 18. One comment objected to the monograph limitation of a single dose ofa nighttime sleep-aid at bedtime because there is no factual evidence thatwould indicate that a repeat dose in 4 hours is not safe and effective.The comment requested that the monograph be amended to include the provisionfor a repeat dose in 4 hours if necessary. The agency recognizes that an antihistamine that is marketed OTC for reliefof cough/cold symptoms bears directions for use that recommend a repeatdose every 4 hours as needed. Although the comment is correct that thereis no evidence to show that repeating the OTC nighttime sleep-aid dosewould not be safe and effective, data on a repeat dose in 4 hours werenot submitted to the agency and the comment presented none. In addition,the data that were submitted demonstrated that the antihistamines are aneffective sleep-aid after only one dose has been taken. Therefore, thedirections for use in this final rule have not been revised to includea repeat dose. 19. One comment recommended that the agency adopt a ``Labeling GeneralStatement'' in the final monograph to explain FDA's position on the followingaspects of OTC drug labeling: Confusing claims, unsupported or misleadingclaims, claims implying a unique action, statement of quantity of activeingredients, declaration of inactive ingredients, and general warning statements.The agency believes that the OTC drug regulations in Part 330 explain theagency's policy regarding many of the items outlined by the comment. Forexample, andSection; 330.1(e) explains the position regarding inactive ingredientsin OTC drug products; andSection; 330.1(g) contains general warning statementsthat should be included on all OTC drug products (see also discussion ofthe general pregnancy-nursing warning in comment 17 above); andSection; 330.1(j)recommends that the labeling contain the quantitative amounts of activeingredient per dosage unit; and andSection; 330.10(a)(4)(v) states that ``labelingshall be clear and truthful in all respects and may not be false or misleadingin any particular.'' Specific labeling claims or problems are adequatelydiscussed in the respective rulemakings. In light of the discussion above,the agency does not believe it is necessary to adopt a general labelingstatement as recommended by the comment. C. Comments on Combination Drug Products 20. One comment disagreed with the agency's conclusions regarding combinationsof OTC nighttime sleep-aids with analgesic ingredients. Specifically, thecomment objected to the agency's insistence on factorially designed studiesto demonstrate a target population that would benefit from such combinations.The comment contended that there is compelling logic for the existenceof a target population of individuals with sleeplessness due to pain andthat the tension component of pain produces a degree of sleeplessness beyondthat produced by the pain itself. Although an analgesic may relieve thepain and indirectly relieve the tension and allow for sleep, the nighttimesleep-aid ingredient will enhance this effect by directly relieving thetension and its resultant sleeplessness. The comment referred to a publishedarticle to support this theory (Ref. 1). The comment further argued that the OTC drug regulations in andSection; 330.10(a)(4)(iv)do not require a showing that each ingredient in a combination productis needed. The comment pointed out that the regulations for prescriptiondrug combination products (21 CFR 300.50) make it mandatory not only thateach ingredient make a contribution, ``but also that there be a significantpatient population requiring such concurrent therapy.'' The comment statedthat the absence of such specific language in the OTC drug regulationsmakes it clear that, for OTC drug combinations, each ingredient does nothave to be shown to be needed.Several comments submitted results of a number of studies in which nighttimesleep-aid/analgesic combination drug products were evaluated to determinewhether such combinations should be generally recognized as safe and effectivein the final monograph (Ref. 2). One comment also requested a hearing onthis issue. The article cited by the comment (Ref. 1) does not support the claimedtheory that the addition of an antihistamine to an analgesic, for use inindividuals with sleeplessness due to pain, provides for relief of thetension component of pain and its resultant sleeplessness. In this randomized,double-blind, crossover study, 206 patients were treated for ``simple nervoustension accompanied by headache'' using phenyltoloxamine citrate alone,acetaminophen alone, the combination of these two drugs, or placebo. Thesubjects rated each treatment with respect to degree of relief and timeinterval until maximum relief was obtained for each of the symptoms oftension, anxiety, irritability, and headache. Sleep was not a measuredparameter in this study and, therefore, the study is of little value inassessing the effectiveness of the antihistamine in providing or enhancinga sleep effect. The agency has also reviewed the clinical studies and information submittedin the other comments (Ref. 2). These studies contain new data on the safetyand effectiveness of a combination of two analgesics with diphenhydraminefor use as a nighttime pain reliever. These studies, however, ``do notprovide comparisons between the combinations and their individual antihistamineand analgesic components'' (Ref. 3). The agency concludes that the availabledata remain insufficient to demonstrate whether the addition of a nighttimesleep-aid enhances the effectiveness of the analgesic to allow labelingthe product as a ``nighttime pain reliever.'' Regarding the need to identify a target population that could benefit froman OTC nighttime pain reliever, the agency recognizes the fact that thestudy design proposed in the OTC nighttime sleep-aid tentative final monographseparated the test population into two groups, i.e., individuals with sleeplessnessrelated to pain and those who suffer from sleeplessness not related topain. In proposing this latter group, the agency recognized the existenceof a suitable target population for the combination of an OTC nighttimesleep-aid and internal analgesic(s). In this patient population are individualswho might on a given night have both sleep problems and mild to moderatepain. In cases where only one symptom occurs, it is more appropriate toselect drugs separately for specific symptomatic relief. Since publication of the Panel's findings and the tentative final monograph,the agency announced on November 28, 1978, the availability of a guidelinethat states in detail its policy for combining two or more safe and effectiveOTC active drug ingredients (43 FR 55466). The agency uses this guidelinein addition to the existing regulatory requirements for OTC combinationdrugs in andSection; 330.10(a)(4)(iv). The guideline is currently availablefor public examination at FDA's Dockets Management Branch (Docket No. 78D-0322).Item (1) of the guidelines states, ``Category I active ingredients fromdifferent therapeutic categories may be combined to treat different symptomsconcurrently only if each ingredient is present within its establishedsafe and effective dosage range and the combination meets the OTC combinationpolicy in all other respects.'' In reviewing the information available several years ago, the agency tentativelyconcluded that the combination of an OTC nighttime sleep-aid and OTC internalanalgesic(s) was reasonable, provided the combination was properly labeledfor use only when concurrent symptoms exist, e.g., for occasional minoraches, pains, and headache with accompanying sleeplessness. Accordingly,at that time, the agency planned to reclassify the combination of a nighttimesleep-aid and internal analgesic(s) from Category III to Category I. The agency's detailed comments and evaluation of the data are on file inthe Dockets Management Branch (Ref. 4). Subsequently, the agency reevaluated the existing information and has tentativelyconcluded that the combination of an OTC nighttime sleep-aid and OTC internalanalgesic(s) should not be included in the final monograph at this time.Even though the agency had earlier indicated that one can reasonably concludethat an appropriate patient population exists, i.e., patients with painwith concurrent sleeplessness unrelated to the pain, the agency now believesthat a more scientific basis is needed to support this conclusion. Theagency believes that it must be shown with valid data that there is a populationneeding a product identified as an ``analgesic/nighttime sleep-aid.'' Theagency also believes that data are needed to show that the sleeplessnessis not relieved by the analgesic alone but that both ingredients in thecombination product contribute to its claimed effects. A study is neededin which the contribution of both components has been shown to relievethe sleeplessness. The agency believes that the best study population forthis purpose would be one in which patients complain of sleeplessness thatis not perceived as resulting from the pain they have. If a target populationwith concomitant pain and sleeplessness that clearly requires both an analgesicand a nighttime sleep-aid can be established, then labeling for such acombination would have to state clearly that it is for use only when bothsymptoms occur together, not when only one occurs and/or the other is anticipated.The agency's detailed comments and reevaluation of the data are on filein the Dockets Management Branch (Ref. 5). In response to the agency'sletter, additional data containing the results of two factorial designclinical studies were submitted to the agency on December 22, 1986 (Ref.6). The data are presently under review.In view of the change in the agency's tentative conclusions on the data(Refs. 4 and 5) and the submission of additional data, and because a hearingwas requested on this combination issue, the agency is not issuing a finaldecision on the appropriateness of a combination of an OTC nighttime sleep-aidand an OTC internal analgesic(s) at this time. A final decision on thisissue will be published in a future issue of the <T4> Federal Register.</T4> Prior to any final agency action, an opportunityfor a hearing on this issue will be provided unless the comment advisesthe agency otherwise. An appropriate notice will be published in the <T4> Federal Register.</T4>The agency has determined that because all issues relating to single-ingredientnighttime sleep-aid drug products have been resolved, a final monographcovering only these products should be issued before the status of thecombination is resolved. Accordingly, combinations of a monograph nighttimesleep-aid and an internal analgesic(s) are exempt from the requirementsof the final rule until a final decision on such a combination is issuedin a future issue of the <T4> Federal Register.</T4><ITAG tagnum="81">References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Gilbert, M. M., N. De Sola Pool, and C. Schecter, ``Analgesic/CalmativeEffects of Acetaminophen and Phenyltoloxamine In Treatment of Simple NervousTension Accompanied By Headache,'' <T3>Current Therapeutic Research,</T3> 20:53-58, 1976.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Comment Nos. OB0018, C00031, and C00032, Docket No. 75N-0244,Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Letter from W. E. Gilbertson, FDA, to B. M. Lanman, Bristol MyersProducts. coded LET003, Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Letter from W. E. Gilbertson, FDA, to W. B. Elvers, Bristol MyersProducts, coded LET009, Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Letter from W. E. Gilbertson, FDA, to W. B. Elvers, Bristol MyersProducts coded LET012, Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Comment No. C00038, Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG>D. Comments on Pyrilamine21. Results of several studies were submitted to support general recognitionof the safety and effectiveness of pyrilamine maleate as an OTC nighttimesleep-aid ingredient (Refs. 1 through 4). One comment recommended removingpyrilamine from the OTC market as a nighttime sleep-aid ingredient becauselong-term carcinogenicity studies have not been performed and because anorexia,nausea, and vomiting are commonly encountered when doses of 25 to 50 mgare ingested (43 FR 25544 at 25588).The data submitted by the comments included a clinical study by Fabre (Ref.2); a clinical study by Hartmann, Marsh, and Soderland (Ref. 3); and asleep laboratory study by Vogel (Ref. 4). The agency has reviewed thesestudies and concludes that they do not support the reclassification ofpyrilamine maleate from Category III to Category I as an OTC nighttimesleep-aid.<T3>Fabre study (Ref. 2).</T3> This study was a randomized, double-blind,two-treatment, two-period crossover study conducted at two different sites(Houston and Austin) comparing 50 mg pyrilamine maleate to placebo in 100patients with mild, nonchronic insomnia. Each treatment period lasted 1week and there was no washout between periods.Considering the data as analyzed, the accuracy of the signed-rank testsare difficult to verify because the analyses are poorly documented. Insteadof presenting the sum of the ranks, the mean of the ranks was used. Thetest procedure is based on the sum, and the mean is irrelevant and uninformative.Even ignoring the problems with the data analyses, the results are veryunusual. Every comparison was highly significant (p=0.005) in favor ofpyrilamine in the Houston clinic. Only one variable, sleep duration, wassignificant (p=0.02) in favor of pyrilamine in the Austin clinic. For theremaining variables, the smallest significance level was p=0.12. Thereare no apparent reasons for the disparity between the two clinics.<T3>Hartmann, Marsh, and Soderland study (Ref. 3).</T3> This study hadthe same basic design as the Fabre study except that the treatment periodswere 6 days long and there was a 2-day washout period between treatments.One-hundred-eight subjects satisfied the selection criteria; one patientwas excluded from the analysis. For inclusion into the study, subjectswere to have mild, nonchronic difficulties in falling asleep for at least30 minutes. However, over 50 percent of the subjects reported they usuallyfell asleep within 15 minutes, thus making efficacy difficult to demonstrate.Analyses were presented for both the daily sleep questionnaires and thepost-treatment questionnaires. However, as with the Fabre study, some analyseswere not appropriate for a crossover study, and those that were appropriatewere poorly documented. In addition, the roles of the three investigatorswere not defined. Therefore, the agency is unable to assess whether investigatorbias was introduced into the treatment comparisons.<T3>Vogel study (Ref. 4).</T3> This was a 10-day, double-blind, sleep laboratorystudy comparing pyrilamine 50 mg to placebo in 14 subjects with subjectiveand objective sleep onset insomnia. FDA's nonparametric analyses showedsignificantly fewer awakenings (p=0.01) and significantly shorter waketime after first persistent sleep onset (p=0.02) with pyrilamine as comparedto baseline. However, there were no significant improvements for totalsleep time (p=0.22), sleep latency to first sleep (p=0.13), and sleep latencyto first persistent sleep (p=0.70). In fact, the mean sleep latency tofirst persistent sleep, the objective variable used as a criterion forentrance into the study, increased with pyrilamine by 18 minutes. Thus,the persistent sleep latency actually worsened with pyrilamine as comparedto the placebo baseline nights. For the subjective variables, there wereno comparisons that were significant at p=0.05.On April 16, 1982, additional information was submitted to the agency (Ref.5), including letters from Drs. Fabre, Hartmann, and Vogel addressing theagency's comments and evaluation (Ref. 6) on their studies. In a letterdated April 4, 1983, the agency discussed its review of these letters andconcluded that the data provide insufficient evidence of effectivenessfor pyrilamine as an OTC nighttime sleep-aid (Ref. 7). In its letter, FDAdiscussed the following: (1) There were no analyses of the first period data of the Fabre study(Ref. 2) despite the fact that the lack of such analyses was addressedearlier in the agency's comments and evaluation of June 17, 1981 (Ref.6). The data submitted are still based on analyses which are not appropriatefor crossover studies, and there was no satisfactory explanation for thelarge disparity between the results of the Austin and Houston clinics.It is difficult to conclude that these differences could be attributedto the demographic differences between the two clinics as suggested byDr. Fabre. (2) Of the five efficacy variables (sleep latency, number of awakenings,total time spent awake, sleep duration, and sleep quality) suggested fortesting in the Hartmann, Marsh, and Soderland study (Ref. 3), none favorpyrilamine at the 0.05 level of significance. Only two variables (sleeplatency and quality of sleep) favor pyrilamine and only at the 0.10 significancelevel (Ref. 8). The agency has reviewed the new analysis by Dr. Hartmann,which reportedly demonstrates the superiority of pyrilamine compared toplacebo at greater statistical significance if subjects with a sleep latencyin excess of 15 minutes are analyzed separately. It was necessary to excludeslightly more than half of the patients who could be evaluated in orderto show a difference in sleep latency that favored pyrilamine at the 0.05level of significance. Little weight can be attached to results that wereobtained by excluding more than half of the patients on the basis of anapparently arbitrary criterion. Dr. Hartmann has stated that his patients had mild sleep latency problems,but generally were not suffering from other forms of insomnia. The factthat less than half the patients' usual sleep latency exceeded 15 minutes,and only for 13 percent did it exceed 30 minutes, leads to the conclusionthat these patients' sleep latency problems were so mild that the inconclusiveresults may be attributed to poor patient selection. (3) The results of the Vogel study (Ref. 4) do not show that pyrilaminereduces sleep latency. Based on the fact that sleep laboratory studieshave been able to show an effect on sleep latency for two other OTC nighttimesleep-aids (diphenhydramine and doxylamine), the agency concludes thatthe results of this study do not support pyrilamine's claim of effectivenessas a nighttime sleep-aid. Based on the additional information submitted, the agency concludes thatthe data are still inadequate to include pyrilamine in the monograph (CategoryI) for use as an OTC nighttime sleep-aid. The agency's detailed commentsand evaluation of the additional information are on file in the DocketsManagement Branch (Refs. 6, 7, and 8). <ITAG tagnum="81">References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Comment No. C00031, Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Fabre, L.F., ``Double-Blind Controlled Evaluation of PyrilamineMaleate and Placebo in Insomniac Patients Suffering Primarily From DifficultiesFalling Asleep,'' unpublished study No. I, Comment Nos. C00033 and SUP006,Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Hartmann, E.L., E.B. Marsh, and C.A. Soderland, ``The ClinicalEvaluation of Pyrilamine Maleate vs. Placebo as a Nighttime Sleep-aid forPatients With Occasional Non-chronic Insomnia,'' unpublished study No.II, Comment Nos. C00033 and SUP006, Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets ManagementBranch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Vogel, G.W., ``The Effects of Pyrilamine Maleate 50 mg on theSleep Cycle of Healthy Adults with Insomnia,'' unpublished study No. III,Comment Nos. C00033 and SUP006, Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets ManagementBranch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Letter from A.G. Eckian to W.E. Gilbertson, FDA, coded LET008,Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Letter from W. E. Gilbertson, FDA, to A. G. Eckian, coded LET005,Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Letter from W. E. Gilbertson, FDA, to A. G. Eckian, coded LET011,Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Letter from W. E. Gilbertson, FDA, to A. G. Eckian, coded CR0003,Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG>E. Comments on Diphenhydramine 22. The results of several studies were submitted to support general recognitionof the safety and effectiveness of diphenhydramine hydrochloride and diphenhydraminecitrate as OTC nighttime sleep-aid ingredients (Refs. 1 through 12). Diphenhydraminehydrochloride was evaluated in eight studies (Refs. 1 through 8) and diphenhydraminecitrate in the other four studies (Refs. 9 through 12). The agency finds that many of the clinical studies conducted with diphenhydraminehydrochloride (Refs. 1 through 8) were conducted on hospitalized patientsand not on the target population, e.g., mild insomniacs, or lacked propersample size or protocol design and therefore are supportive of effectiveness,but do not alone establish general recognition of OTC safety and effectiveness.For example, one double-blind placebo-controlled study (Ref. 5) comparedthe effects of 50 mg and 100 mg diphenhydramine hydrochloride in 584 post-ophthalmicsurgery patients at the Massachusetts Eye and Ear Infirmary who anticipatedhaving trouble sleeping. The duration of therapy was one night. Side effectswere also measured and grouped into eight categories. Both the 50 mg and100 mg doses of diphenhydramine hydrochloride were significantly superiorto placebo. The differences in efficacy between the 50 mg and 100 mg doseswere not statistically significant although the incidence of anticholinergicside effects was significantly higher in the 100-mg group. The incidenceof other side effects was low with no significant differences between thetwo drug groups and the placebo group. This study is acceptable as evidenceof the hypnotic efficacy and safety of diphenhydramine hydrochloride. Thestudy establishes the optimal dose of diphenhydramine hydrochloride as50 mg because the 100-mg dose was associated with a significant increasein anticholinergic side effects with no added increase in effectiveness.The studies by Rickels (Ref. 6) and Finnerty and Goldberg (Ref. 7), conductedin Philadelphia and Boston, support the effectiveness of diphenhydramineas a nighttime sleep-aid. These studies were randomized, double-blind,two-treatment, two-period crossover studies with each period lasting 1week. Both studies compared 50 mg diphenhydramine hydrochloride to placeboin healthy adults who had mild nonchronic insomnia. In the Philadelphia study, diphenhydramine hydrochloride was significantlybetter (p=0.05) than placebo for sleep latency, degree to which medicationhelped, depth of sleep, and quality of sleep. At the less conservative0.10 level of significance, diphenhydramine was better than placebo forthe amount of time spent awake in bed. In the Boston study, diphenhydramine was significantly better (p=0.05)than placebo for sleep latency, degree to which medication helped, depthof sleep, quality, of sleep, feeling rested upon awakening, and degreeof energy during previous day. At the less conservative 0.10 level of significance,diphenhydramine was better than placebo for the amount of time spent awakein bed. Side effects in both studies were low with expected side effects of drowsiness,dizziness, and grogginess occurring more frequently in the diphenhydraminegroup. The differences in other side effects between the treatment andplacebo groups were not significant. The agency concludes that these studiesdemonstrate that diphenhydramine hydrochloride in a dose of 50 mg is safeand effective as an OTC nighttime sleep-aid. The agency's detailed comments and evaluation of the data are on file inthe Dockets Management Branch (Refs. 13 and 14). In a notice published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on April 23, 1982 (47 FR 17740), the FDA's formerBureau of Drugs concluded that the studies described above (Refs. 1 through12) resolved safety and effectiveness issues that had been raised whenthe advance notice of proposed rulemaking and notice of proposed rulemakingwere published in the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>The Bureau determined, after reviewing all ofthe submitted data, that 50 mg diphenhydramine hydrochloride and 76 mgdiphenhydramine citrate were appropriate dosage levels in drug productsintended for use as OTC nighttime sleep-aids. The Bureau concluded thatthe citrate salt could be considered identical to the hydrochloride saltbecause the citrate salt is rapidly converted in the stomach to the hydrochloridesalt. However, a dose of 76 mg diphenhydramine citrate is necessary tosupply a diphenhydramine content equivalent to 50 mg diphenhydramine hydrochloride.The notice also announced an enforcement policy to permit the OTC marketingof diphenhydramine as an ingredient in nighttime sleep-aid drug products.The enforcement policy permits the OTC marketing of such drug productspending establishment under the OTC drug review of a final monograph underwhich drug products containing diphenhydramine that are intended for useas OTC nighttime sleep-aids will be generally recognized as safe and effectiveand not misbranded. The notice provided interested persons an opportunity to submit writtencomments for determining whether further amendments to, or revisions of,this policy are warranted. In response to the notice, the Drug EnforcementAdministration, U.S. Department of Justice and one individual submittedcomments. The comment from the Drug Enforcement Administration was concernedwith  the drug abuse potential of diphenhydramine and is addressed in comment23 below. The other comment requested clarification as to which of the 12 unpublishedstudies was the basis for the conclusion that safety and effectivenessissues previously raised were resolved. The comment further stated thatsuch information is needed because information obtained by the commentorunder the Freedom of Information Act reveals that at least two of the 12studies (Refs. 6 and 7) were found to be grossly deficient and unacceptableduring establishment inspections by the FDA. In 1980, FDA investigators did visit the researchers of the unpublishedstudies (Refs. 6 and 7) to evaluate the clinical trials with diphenhydraminehydrochloride as an OTC nighttime sleep-aid. The agency agrees that someviolations in the protocol were found. However, the agency has determinedthat these violations, for the most part, were minor, and the agency feelsthat it is unlikely that they could have had a significant impact on theresults. In summary, the agency concludes that the submitted data provide sufficientevidence to demonstrate general recognition of the safety and effectivenessof diphenhydramine hydrochloride in a dose of 50 mg and diphenhydraminecitrate in a dose of 76 mg for use as an OTC nighttime sleep-aid, and theseingredients are included in the final monograph.<ITAG tagnum="81">References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Sunshine, A., and E. Laska, ``A Comparative Study of Diphenhydramine50 mg and Placebo,'' unpublished study No. S-2162A, Comment Nos. 0B0018,SUP002, and C00035, Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Sunshine, A., and E. Laska, ``A Comparative Study of Diphenhydramine50 mg and Placebo,'' unpublished study No. S-2162B, Comment Nos. 0B0018,SUP002, and C00035, Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Sunshine, A., I. Zighelboim, and E. Laska, ``Hypnotic Activityof Diphenhydramine, Methapyrilene, and Placebo,'' unpublished study No.W-2080, Comment Nos. 0B0018, SUP002, and C00035, Docket No. 75N-0244, DocketsManagement Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Glassman, S., and E.W. Packman, ``Subjective Evaluation of theIncidence of Side Effects Produced by 50 mg and 100 mg Doses of DiphenhydramineHCl Versus Placebo,'' unpublished study No. S-2519, Comment No. SUP002,Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Smith, P. H., ``Pain/Sedative Study,'' unpublished study No. S-2512,Comment Nos. SUP003 and C00035, Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets ManagementBranch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Rickels, K., ``Double-Blind, Controlled Evaluation of Diphenhydramineand Placebo in Insomniac General Practice Patients,'' unpublished study,Comment Nos. C00030, SUP004, and SUP005, Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets ManagementBranch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Finnerty, R., and H. Goldberg, ``Double-Blind, Controlled Evaluationof Diphenhydramine and Placebo in Insomniac General Practice Patients,''unpublished study, Comment Nos. C00030, SUP004, and SUP005, Docket No.75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Holder, A., and K.J. Kohlhof, ``Assessment of the Sleep ProlongationProperties of Two Analgesic/Sedative Tablets Versus Placebo in HealthyAdults,'' unpublished study No. S-2593, Comment Nos. C00032 and C00035,Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) Sunshine, A., and E. Laska, unpublished study No. S-2127, CommentNos. 0B0018, SUP002, and C00035, Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets ManagementBranch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) Sunshine, A., and I. Zighelboim, ``Subjective Clinical Evaluationof the Relative Analgesic/Sedative Effects of an Analgesic/Sedative Tabletvs. Placebo,'' unpublished study No. S-2469, Comment Nos. C00032 and C00035,Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(11) Sunshine, A., and C. Roure, ``Subjective Clinical Evaluationof the Analgesic/Sedative Effects of an Analgesic/Sedative Tablet vs. Placebo,''unpublished study No. S-2591, Comment Nos. C00032 and C00035, Docket No.75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(12) Furst, D., and L. Winter, ``Subjective Clinical Evaluation ofthe Sedative Effects of Two Analgesic/Sedative Tablets vs. Placebo,'' unpublishedstudy No. S-2605, Comment Nos. C00032 and C00035, Docket No. 75N-0244,Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(13) Letter from W. E. Gilbertson, FDA, to B. M. Lanman, Bristol MyersProducts, coded LET004, Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(14) Letter from W. E. Gilbertson,. FDA, to R. A. Schultz, The J.B. Williams Company, Inc., coded LET006, Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets ManagementBranch.</ITAG>23. One comment was concerned with the drug abuse potential of diphenhydramine.The comment submitted data from the Drug Enforcement Administration's (DEA)System to Retrieve Information from Drug Evidence (STRIDE) and argued thatthe data show significant current problems relating to abuse and traffickingof diphenhydramine that may pose a serious risk to the public health (Ref.1). The comment added that diphenhydramine was involved in 36 criminalinvestigations between 1975 and 1982, but because diphenhydramine is notscheduled in the Controlled Substances Act, it is not a primary objectof those criminal investigations in which it is encountered. The comment noted that data from the Drug Abuse Warning Network (DAWN)compiled by the National Institute on Drug Abuse (NIDA) have ranked diphenhydraminein the ``Top 50'' list of drugs mentioned in overdose cases seen in hospitalemergency rooms and that for the period from January to July of 1981, diphenhydramineranked 27th on the list, higher than many controlled substances, includingmethadone, LSD, barbiturates, ethchlorvynol, codeine, meprobamate, meperidine,amphetamine, oxazepam, and hydromorphone (Ref. 2). The comment added that,in 1981, 29 percent (396) of the overdose victims included in the DAWNdata used diphenhydramine alone, and the remaining 71 percent (961) useddiphenhydramine in various combinations. The comment stated that the motivationfor taking diphenhydramine was attributed to psychic effects or dependencein 25 percent, or 333 cases, and suicide attempts in 58 percent, or 781cases. The comment pointed out that the main source of diphenhydraminefor an overdose victim was through legal prescription, but that between1979 and 1981, a significant and increasing source of the drug was fromillicit sources_thefts and ``street buys.'' The comment urged FDA to consider the STRIDE and DAWN data prior to issuingrules that would make diphenhydramine more available to the drug abusecommunity, i.e., through OTC marketing. The comment argued that, in additionto STRIDE and DAWN data, the diphenhydramine abuse portrait includes diversionfrom foreign drug manufacturers, transportation to clandestine laboratoriesin South America, illicit formulation into methaqualone ``look-alikes,''smuggling into the United States, and domestic pharmacy theft. The agency has reviewed the data submitted by the comment and concludesthat these data do not present a clear picture of deliberate misuse andabuse of diphenhydramine, nor do they show that diphenhydramine marketedOTC as a nighttime sleep-aid at a recommended dose of 50 mg of diphenhydraminehydrochloride or 76 mg of diphenhydramine monocitrate is likely to becomea serious risk to public health through abuse. The STRIDE data illustrate that diphenhydramine had been used to producecounterfeit methaqualone tablet's, but do not show that diphenhydraminewas in demand for itself. An illicit international trade in both the commerciallymanufactured and the clandestinely manufactured counterfeit methaqualonetablets used to exist with a wide geographic distribution. However, FDAhas removed methaqualone from the United States market. (See the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of September 17, 1984; 49 FR 36441.) Therefore,the agency does not believe that the counterfeiting program that previouslyexisted is a sufficient basis to keep diphenhydramine off the OTC market.An overdose per se does not necessarily mean that the drug in questionis a drug of abuse. Certainly, so far as the trafficking and diversiondata are concerned, it appears that diphenhydramine was primarily a drugof deceit and only secondarily a drug of abuse. With reference to the listingof diphenhydramine in the DAWN ``Top 50'' list, the agency questions whetherthe overdose victims were knowingly taking diphenhydramine or whether theywere taking diphenhydramine manufactured to resemble a prescription drugproduct containing methaqualone and represented to them as methaqualone.A number of OTC drugs have been involved in the illicit look-alike drugmarket, and the agency is convinced of the seriousness of the situation.However, misuse of a drug such as diphenhydramine that occurs because thedrug is represented as a more potent substance does not necessarily meanthat the drug itself is a drug of abuse. (See also comment 10 above.) The agency is concerned about the possibility of any adverse effects resultingfrom the use of OTC drug products, but it also recognizes that a numberof substances in the marketplace have the potential for misuse by someindividuals. However, this is not sufficient reason for withholding suchdrugs from legitimate OTC uses for which they are safe and effective. Thereports of diphenhydramine abuse cited by the comment do not indicate awidespread problem, nor do they show any correlation between this abuseand OTC marketing of the drug. Therefore, at this time the agency findsno reason why diphenhydramine should not be available OTC as a nighttimesleep-aid. Nevertheless, the agency will continue to monitor this situationcarefully and will take appropriate action if additional information shouldbecome available concerning diphenhydramine abuse as a result of OTC marketing.<ITAG tagnum="81">References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Trafficking Information on Diphenhydramine Retrieved from STRIDE,January 1975 to April 1982, OTC Volume 050FM, Docket No. 75N-0244, DocketsManagement Branch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Top Fifty Estimates of Specific Drug Mentions, OTC Volume 050FM,Docket No. 75N-0244, Dockets Management Branch. </ITAG>F. Comments on Scopolamine 24. One comment requested the agency to reconsider the Category II classificationof scopolamine compounds and reclassify these ingredients in Category IIIfor use in combination with other OTC nighttime sleep-aid ingredients.The agency's conclusions on scopolamine compounds as nighttime sleep-aidingredients were previously set forth in the tentative final monographon OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug products (43 FR 25544 at 25548 and 25575-25578).The comment has provided no reason to alter these conclusions, nor haveany new data been submitted to the agency since publication of the tentativefinal monograph. Therefore, scopolamine compounds will not be includedin the OTC nighttime sleep-aid final monograph.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Summary of Significant Changes to the Proposed Rule</ITAG>1. The agency has redesignated proposed Subpart D as Subpart C and hasplaced the labeling sections of the monograph in Subpart C.2. The claim ``reduces time to fall asleep if you have difficulty fallingasleep'' has been added to the indications section of the monograph. Theindication ``helps fall asleep'' has been revised to read ``helps you fallasleep if you have difficulty falling asleep.'' (See comment 12 above.)3. The definition of a nighttime sleep-aid has been revised slightly. (Seecomment 12 above.)4. The warning in andSection; 338.50(c)(3) has been expanded to be consistentwith the warning proposed in the tentative final monograph for OTC antihistaminedrug products to read ``Do not take this product if you have asthma, glaucoma,emphysema, chronic pulmonary disease, shortness of breath, difficulty inbreathing, or difficulty in urination due to enlargement of the prostategland unless directed by a doctor.'' (For discussion of the need to expandthe warning, see the <T4> Federal Register</T4> of January 15, 1985; 50 FR 2200 at 2215.) Thepreviously proposed requirement that this warning be in type at least twicethe size as other warnings is not being included in the final monographbecause the agency believes that all warnings for OTC nighttime sleep-aidsare important and should be displayed with equal prominence on the label.5. The warning in andSection; 338.50(c)(4) has been expanded and revisedto read ``Avoid alcoholic beverages while taking this product. Do not takethis product if you are taking sedatives or tranquilizers, without firstconsulting your doctor.'' (See comment 16 above.)6. The directions for nighttime sleep-aids in the proposed and tentativefinal monographs stated ``* * * once daily at bedtime * * * .'' The agencybelieves that the phrase ``once daily'' implies that these products areto be taken every day, when in fact they should be taken only if the userhas difficulty in falling asleep. Therefore, the directions in the finalmonograph have been revised to state that the dose is to be taken ``* ** at bedtime if needed * * *'' instead of ``* * * once daily at bedtime* * * .''7. In an effort to simplify OTC drug labeling, the agency proposed in anumber of tentative final monographs to substitute the word ``doctor''for ``physician'' in OTC drug monographs on the basis that the word ``doctor''is more commonly used and better understood by consumers. Based on commentsreceived to these proposals, the agency has determined that final monographsand other applicable OTC drug regulations will give manufacturers the optionof using either the word ``physician'' or the word ``doctor.'' This finalmonograph includes that option. (See andSection; 338.50(e).)8. The agency's final decision on the appropriateness of a combinationof a nighttime sleep-aid and an internal analgesic(s) is not being addressedat this time, but will be addressed in a future issue of the <T4> Federal Register.</T4> (See comment 20 above.)9. The ingredients doxylamine succinate, phenyltoloxamine dihydrogen citrate,and pyrilamine maleate were listed in the tentative final monograph asCategory III ingredients (43 FR 25579). Because no additional data weresubmitted that establish the general recognition of safety and effectivenessof these ingredients as OTC nighttime sleep aids, they are not includedin the final monograph. (See also comment 21 above.) However, OTC nighttimesleep-aid drug products containing doxylamine succinate are presently beingmarketed under approved NDA's. The agency advises that the marketing statusof those products is unaffected by this final monograph.10. Diphenhydramine hydrochloride and diphenhydramine citrate are includedin the monograph for use as OTC nighttime sleep-aids. (See comment 22 above.)<ITAG tagnum="84">III. The Agency's Final Conclusions on OTC Nighttime Sleep-Aid DrugProducts</ITAG>Based on the available evidence, the agency is issuing a final monographestablishing conditions under which OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug productsare generally recognized as safe and effective and not misbranded. Specifically,the agency has determined that the only ingredients that have been determinedto be monograph conditions are diphenhydramine hydrochloride and diphenhydraminecitrate. All other ingredients considered in this rulemaking have beendetermined to be nonmonograph conditions for use as a nighttime sleep-aid:doxylamine succinate, methapyrilene fumarate, methapyrilene hydrochloride,phenyltoloxamine dihydrogen citrate, pyrilamine maleate, ammonium bromide,potassium bromide, sodium bromide, scopolamine aminoxide hydrobromide,scopolamine hydrobromide, acetaminophen, aspirin, salicylamide, thiaminehydrochloride, and passion flower extract. Any drug product marketed foruse as an OTC nighttime sleep-aid that is not in conformance with the monograph(21 CFR Part 338) may be considered a new drug within the meaning of section201(p) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 321(P)) andmisbranded under section 502 of the act (21 U.S.C. 352) and may not bemarketed for this use unless it is the subject of an approved NDA. Thereare several nighttime sleep-aid drug products containing doxylamine succinatethat are presently being marketed OTC under approved NDA's. The agencyadvises that the marketing status of those products is unaffected by thisfinal monograph. If any drug manufacturer believes that there are adequatedata establishing general recognition of the safety and effectiveness ofdoxylamine succinate as an OTC nighttime sleep-aid, such data may be submittedin an appropriate citizen petition to amend the monograph. (See 21 CFR10.30.)The agency has examined the economic consequences of this final rule inconjunction with other rules resulting from the OTC drug review. In a noticepublished in the <T4> Federal Register</T4> of February 8, 1983 (48 FR 5806), the agencyannounced the availability of an assessment of these economic impacts.The assessment determined that the combined impacts of all the rules resultingfrom the OTC drug review do not constitute a major rule according to thecriteria established by Executive Order 12291. The agency therefore concludesthat no one of these rules, including this final rule for OTC nighttimesleep-aid drug products, is a major rule.The economic assessment also concluded that the overall OTC drug reviewwas not likely to have a significant economic impact on a substantial numberof small entities as defined in the Regulatory Flexibility Act (Pub. L.96-354). That assessment included a discretionary Regulatory FlexibilityAnalysis in the event that an individual rule might impose an unusual ordisproportionate impact on small entities. However, the requirement fora Regulatory Flexibility Analysis under the Regulatory Flexibility Actdoes not apply to this final rule for OTC nighttime sleep-aid drug productsbecause the proposed rule was issued prior to January 1, 1981, and is thereforeexempt.The agency has determined under 21 CFR 25.24(c)(6) that this action isof a type that does not individually or cumulatively have a significanteffect on the human environment. Therefore, neither an environmental assessmentnor an environmental impact statement is required.<ITAG tagnum="85">List of Subjects in 21 CFR Part 338 </ITAG>Labeling, Nighttime sleep-aid drug products, Over-the-counter drugs. Therefore, under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, and the AdministrativeProcedure Act, Subchapter D of Chapter I of Title 21 of the Code of FederalRegulations is amended by adding new Part 338, to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 338_NIGHTTIME SLEEP-AID DRUG PRODUCTS FOR OVER-THE-COUNTER HUMANUSE </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart A_General Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">338.1 Scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">338.3 Definition. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart B_Active Ingredients </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">338.10 Nighttime sleep-aid active ingredients. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart C_Labeling </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">338.50 Labeling of nighttime sleep-aid drug products.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 201(p), 502, 505, 701, 52 Stat. 1041-1042 asamended, 1050-1053 as amended, 1055-1056 as amended by 70 Stat. 919 and72 Stat. 948 (21 U.S.C. 321(p), 352, 355, 371); 5 U.S.C. 553; 21 CFR 5.10and 5.11. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 338.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope. </ITAG>(a) An over-the-counter nighttime sleep-aid drug product in a form suitablefor oral administration is generally recognized as safe and effective andis not misbranded if it meets each condition in this part and each generalcondition established in andSection; 330.1 of this chapter. (b) References in this part to regulatory sections of the Code of FederalRegulations are to Chapter I of Title 21 unless otherwise noted. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 338.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definition. </ITAG>As used in this part: <T3>Nighttime sleep-aid. </T3>A drug that is useful for the relief of occasionalsleeplessness by individuals who have difficulty falling asleep. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Active Ingredients </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 338.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Nighttime sleep-aid active ingredients. </ITAG>The active ingredient of the product consists of any of the following whenused within the dosage limits established for each ingredient in andSection;338.50(d): (a) Diphenhydramine hydrochloride. (b) Diphenhydramine citrate. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Labeling </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 338.50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Labeling of nighttime sleep-aid drug products. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Statement of identity. </T3>The labeling of the product contains theestablished name of the drug, if any, and identifies the product as a ``nighttimesleep-aid.'' (b) <T3>Indications. </T3>The labeling of the product states, under the heading``Indications,'' one or more of the phrases listed in this paragraph. Othertruthful and nonmisleading statements, describing only the indicationsfor use that have been established and listed in this paragraph (b), mayalso be used, as provided in andSection; 330.1(c)(2) of this chapter, subjectto the provisions of section 502 of the act relating to misbranding andthe prohibition in section 301(d) of the act against the introduction ordelivery for introduction into interstate commerce of unapproved new drugsin violation of section 505(a) of the act. (1) (``Helps you'' or ``Reduces time to'') ``fall asleep if you have difficultyfalling asleep.'' (2) ``For relief of occasional sleeplessness.'' (3) ``Helps to reduce difficulty falling asleep.'' (c) <T3>Warnings. </T3>The labeling of the product contains the following warningsunder the heading ``Warnings'': (1) ``Do not give to children under 12 years of age.'' (2) ``If sleeplessness persists continuously for more than 2 weeks, consultyour doctor. Insomnia may be a symptom of serious underlying medical illness.''(3) ``Do not take this product if you have asthma, glaucoma, emphysema,chronic pulmonary disease, shortness of breath, difficulty in breathing,or difficulty in urination due to enlargement of the prostate gland unlessdirected by a doctor.'' (4) ``Avoid alcoholic beverages while taking this product. Do not takethis product if you are taking sedatives or tranquilizers, without firstconsulting your doctor.'' (d) <T3>Directions. </T3>The labeling of the product contains the followinginformation under the heading ``Directions'': (1) <T3>For products containing diphenhydramine hydrochloride identified inandSection; 338.10(a). </T3>Adults and children 12 years of age and over:Oral dosage is 50 milligrams at bedtime if needed, or as directed by adoctor. (2) <T3>For products containing diphenhydramine citrate identified in andSection;338.10(b). </T3>Adults and children 12 years of age and over: Oral dosageis 76 milligrams at bedtime if needed, or as directed by a doctor. (e) The word ``physician'' may be substituted for the word ``doctor'' inany of the labeling statements in this section.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: January 17, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Frank E. Young, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Commissioner of Food and Drugs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-3384 Filed 2-13-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4160-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>